Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.475

SEED act—Additional funds and purposes.

Sponsoring organizations may seek additional funds to increase the match rate and the maximum annual match amount established pursuant to RCW 43.31.465. Such funds may also be used for purposes in addition to those provided in RCW 43.31.460(2).

[ 2005 c 402 s 7.]